Vermont, session 2025-2026, H624.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. ADULT INVOLUNTARY GUARDIANSHIP WORKING
GROUP; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Adult Involuntary Guardianship Working
Group to study jurisdiction of proceedings involving the involuntary
guardianship of adults. The Working Group shall examine the advisability of
consolidating adult involuntary guardianships under 14 V.S.A. chapter 111,
subchapter 12 (Title 14 involuntary guardianships) with guardianships for
VT LEG #385080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.624
2026 Page 2 of 4
persons with developmental disabilities under 18 V.S.A. chapter 215 (Title 18
guardianships), or otherwise amending the statutes to ensure that respondents
under Title 18 guardianships have access to voluntary guardianships that is
equal to the access to voluntary guardianships available under Title 14.
(b) Membership. The Adult Involuntary Guardianship Working Group
shall be composed of the following members:
(1) the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living or
designee;
(2) the Chief Superior Court Judge or designee;
(3) the Court Administrator or designee;
(4) a superior judge with experience in Title 18 guardianships,
appointed by the Chief Justice;
(5) a probate judge, appointed by the Chief Justice;
(6) a guardian ad litem, appointed by the Court Administrator;
(7) an attorney with experience in adult guardianships, appointed by the
Vermont Bar Association;
(8) an attorney with experience in adult guardianships, appointed by
Vermont Legal Aid;
(9) an independent mental health evaluator, appointed by the
Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living; and
VT LEG #385080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.624
2026 Page 3 of 4
(10) a member, appointed by the Vermont Center for Independent
Living.
(c) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living
shall call the first meeting of the Working Group to occur on or before August
1, 2026.
(2) The Working Group shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(d) Report.
(1)(A) On or before December 15, 2026, the Working Group shall report
its recommendations, including any proposed legislative changes, to the House
and Senate Committees on Judiciary, the House Committee on Human
Services, and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare.
(B) The report shall recommend whether:
(i) Title 14 involuntary guardianship proceedings and Title 18
guardianship proceedings should be consolidated in one division of the
Superior Court; or
(ii) Title 14 involuntary guardianship proceedings and Title 18
guardianship proceedings should remain in separate divisions of the Superior
Court as provided for in existing law.
VT LEG #385080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.624
2026 Page 4 of 4
(2) With respect to subdivisions (1)(B)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, the
report shall address:
(A) the judicial resources and oversight that would be required;
(B) whether, notwithstanding 12 V.S.A. § 2553 or 2555, the Vermont
Supreme Court should have appellate jurisdiction over guardianship
proceedings;
(C) the relationship between guardianships under subdivisions
(1)(B)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (d) and voluntary guardianships under
14 V.S.A. § 2671;
(D) any legislative changes that would need to be made under either
recommendation to ensure that respondents under Title 18 guardianships have
access to voluntary guardianships that is equal to the access to voluntary
guardianships available under Title 14; and
(E) any other matters deemed relevant by the Working Group,
including any matters not currently under the jurisdiction of Title 14
guardianships or Title 18 guardianships.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385080 v.1